Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska81-1565
Funds; department; adopt eligibility guidelines for recipients.

The department shall adopt guidelines for the determination of eligibility of public and private agencies and persons to receive funds pursuant to the Nebraska Litter Reduction and Recycling Act and the determination of qualification and suitability of plans submitted by such agencies and persons consistent with the purposes of the act.

Laws 1979, LB 120, § 32;

Laws 1981, LB 253, § 23;

Laws 1993, LB 203, § 19.
October 30, 2015